Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.472

Washington climate corps network—Powers and duties.

(1) In administration of the Washington climate corps network, the office and serve Washington have the following powers:

(a) The office, in consultation with serve Washington, may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW as shall be necessary to implement the purpose of this chapter. Rules may include provisions to:

(i) Establish common requirements and eligibility criteria under RCW 43.41.470(2)(b);

(ii) Establish a transparent process for establishing priorities and selection criteria for grants dispersed under RCW 43.41.470(2)(d);

(b) Receive gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources that are made for the use or benefit of the Washington climate corps network and to expend the same or any income therefrom according to their terms and the purpose of this chapter.

(2) In carrying out its duties, serve Washington may establish such relationships with public and private institutions, the federal government, tribes, local governments, private industry, community organizations, and other segments of the general public as may be needed to promote and enable climate action through service.

[ 2023 c 231 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 231: See note following RCW 43.41.470.